District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.11

Effect on other laws.

This chapter shall not:

(1)

Supersede any provision of law or contract that provides greater employee paid leave rights than the rights established under this chapter; or

(2)

Modify or affect any federal or District law prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, family responsibilities, genetic information, disability, matriculation, or political affiliation.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 12, 55 DCR 3452